Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 24.5
CONSOLIDATED COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEM AUTHORITY

29-24.5-101 to 29-24.5-105. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article repealed, (SB 14-127), ch. 386, p. 1929, § 5, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2012 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2014. For the text of this article prior to 2014, consult the 2013 Colorado Revised Statutes.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-127, see section 1 of chapter 386, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.